Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.045

Recovery of fees as court costs.

In the event persons other than the sheriff or duly appointed deputies charge a fee for services in excess of the fees allowed under RCW 36.18.040, the prevailing party incurring such charges shall be entitled to recover as court costs only the amount of the fees for such services as provided in RCW 36.18.040.

[ 1981 c 194 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 194: See note following RCW 36.18.040.